Utah statutes.
17C-2-205.   Filing a copy of the urban renewal project area budget.
Each agency adopting an urban renewal project area budget shall:
(1)  within 30 days after adopting the project area budget, file a copy of the
project area budget with the auditor of the county in which the project area
is located, the State Tax Commission, the state auditor, the State Board of
Education, and each taxing entity affected by the agency's collection of tax
increment under the project area budget; and
(2)  if the project area budget allocates tax increment for housing under
Section 17C-1-412, file a copy of the project area budget with the loan fund
board.
